Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2 Regulation and Care of Inmates
41-21-242. Notice of release of certain felons from correctional facilities.

The department of correction shall provide or contract with a private entity to provide, to members of the public who have made a notification request, notification of the release of an inmate serving a felony sentence of two (2) or more years from a facility operated by or under contract with the department or from a county jail or workhouse. The jailer or chief administrator, or a person designated by the jailer or chief administrator, of a county jail or workhouse shall make available to the department, or any private entity under contract with the department, the information necessary to implement this section in a timely manner. The department or the private entity under contract with the department shall be responsible for retrieving the information and notifying the requester in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.

The department shall promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this section.

Any identifying information concerning a person who has received notification pursuant to this section shall be confidential.

For purposes of subdivision (c)(1), “identifying information” means the name, home and work addresses, telephone numbers and social security number of the person being notified or requesting that notification be provided.

Acts 1998, ch. 968, § 1; 2009, ch. 176, § 4.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Notice of release of certain juvenile offenders, § 37-5-123.

41-21-243. Family Visitation and Crime Reduction Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Family Visitation and Crime Reduction Act.”

The general assembly finds that maintaining an inmate's family and community relationships is an important correctional resource that can improve an inmate's behavior in the correctional facility, and upon an inmate's release from a correctional facility, assist in reducing recidivism.

The department shall maintain a visitation program. Policies may include a system for prior approval of visitors and restrictions on visitation deemed appropriate by the commissioner. Each state institution shall have an area designated for visitation. The commissioner of correction shall have the authority to suspend visitation in the event of emergency circumstances as defined in department of correction policies.

The department of correction shall provide, at designated visitation areas for approved visitors in each state correctional facility, information relating to applicable visiting regulations, dress codes and visiting procedures. Visitors not complying with applicable visiting regulations, dress codes and visiting procedures may be denied the privilege to visit in accordance with department policy.

Correctional officers assigned to visitation areas shall receive training on effective communication with family members and children of inmates, for the purpose of improving the quality of family visitation.

The department of correction is encouraged to provide an area for child visitors.

The department of correction shall report at least annually to the state and local government committee of the senate and committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections concerning the department's progress on implementing procedures and services that enhance, improve and encourage visitation. The report must include an executive summary.

Acts 2002, ch. 725, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(f); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 66; 2020, ch. 711, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (g).

The 2020 amendment added the last sentence in (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11. June 15, 2020.

41-21-244. Study and audit of number of incarcerated nonviolent offenders who have not been convicted.

The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study and audit the department of correction concerning the number of nonviolent offenders incarcerated in correctional institutions of the department of correction who have been incarcerated for offenses for which they have not been convicted. The general assembly requests that, if any such study and audit are undertaken, the comptroller of the treasury report to the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives concerning such study and audit on or before the date of the submission of the next regularly scheduled audit of the department of correction.

Acts 2010, ch. 823, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(g); 2013, ch. 236, § 64.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.